Washington statutes.
RCW 19.06.030

Advertising limitations.

No advertising of blind made products shall refer to any product which is not blind made, nor shall any such advertising contain or refer to names or pictures of any blind persons or otherwise exploit the blind.

[ 1961 c 56 s 2.]